California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
  ARTICLE 1. Administration [9251. - 9259.4.]

9251.

The board shall enforce the provisions of this part and may prescribe, adopt, and enforce rules and regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of this part. The board may prescribe the extent to which any ruling or regulation shall be applied without retroactive effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

9252.

The board may employ accountants, auditors, investigators, assistants, and clerks necessary for the efficient administration of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

9253.

Every user and every person dealing in, transporting, or storing fuel in this State shall keep such records, receipts, invoices, and other pertinent papers with respect thereto in such form as the board may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

9254.

The board or its authorized representative may examine the books, papers, records, and equipment of any user or person dealing in, transporting, or storing fuel and may investigate the character of the disposition which the user or person makes of the fuel in order to ascertain whether all excise taxes due under this part are being properly reported and paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

9255.

It is unlawful for the board or any person having an administrative duty under this part to make known in any manner whatever the business affairs, operations, or information obtained by an investigation of records and equipment of any user visited or examined in the discharge of official duty, or the amount or source of income, profits, losses, expenditures, or any particular thereof set forth or disclosed in any return, or to permit any return or copy thereof or any book containing any abstract or particulars thereof to be seen or examined by any person
 except to another government, state agency or federal agency as specified in Section 9255.1. Information respecting the tax due from a user may be furnished, however, to any person owning or having an interest in a motor vehicle subject to the lien of the tax. The Governor may, by general or special order, authorize examination by other state officers, by tax officers of another state, by the federal government, if a reciprocal arrangement exists, or by any other person of the records maintained by the board under this part. The information so obtained pursuant to the order of the Governor shall not be made public except to the extent and in the manner that the order may authorize that it be made public. Successors, receivers, trustees, executors, administrators, assignees, and guarantors, if directly interested, may be given information as to the items included in the measure and amounts of any unpaid tax or amounts of tax required to be collected, interest and penalties.

Any violation of this section is a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 620, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

9255.1.

(a) Upon request from the officials to whom is entrusted the enforcement of the motor fuel tax laws of another government, the board may furnish to those officials any information in the possession of the board that is deemed essential to the enforcement of the motor fuel tax laws. Any information so furnished shall not be used for any purpose other than that for which it was furnished.

(b) The board may furnish to any state or federal agency investigating violations of
 or enforcing any state or federal law related to motor fuels any motor fuel information in the possession of the board that is deemed necessary for the enforcement of those laws.

(c) The board may furnish any interstate user information obtained by the board under this part to any state or federal agency for use by that agency in the enforcement of interstate user registration or licensing laws, or interstate vehicle registration or licensing laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

9255.2.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, any person who is engaged in the business of preparing, or providing services in connection with the preparation of, returns under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 8751), or any person who for compensation prepares any such return for any other person, and who knowingly or recklessly does either of the following, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned no more than one year, or both, together with
 the costs of prosecution:

(1) Discloses any information furnished to him or her for, or in connection with, the preparation of the return.

(2) Uses that information for any purpose other than to prepare, or assist in preparing, the return.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to disclosure of information if that disclosure is made pursuant to the person’s consent or pursuant to a subpoena, court order, or other compulsory legal process.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9256.

Before registering any motor vehicle, the Department of Motor Vehicles shall ascertain from the applicant for registration whether or not the motor vehicle sought to be registered is propelled by a fuel the use of which is subject to the excise tax imposed under this part. If the motor vehicle is propelled by the use of such a fuel, the department shall notify the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

9257.

A certificate by the board or an employee of the board stating that a notice required by this part was given by mailing or personal service shall be prima facie evidence in any administrative or judicial proceeding of the fact and regularity of the mailing or personal service in accordance with any requirement of this part for the giving of a notice. Unless otherwise specifically required, any notice provided by this part to be mailed or served may be given either by mailing or by personal service in the manner provided for giving notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 610.)
-------------------------------------------

9258.

On or after January 1, 1976, any person who equips a vehicle with a system using liquefied petroleum gas, compressed natural gas or liquid natural gas to propel the vehicle, or who transfers any vehicle so equipped shall notify the board within 10 days after so equipping or transferring the vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 807.)
-------------------------------------------

9259.

(a) The board shall determine which taxpayer’s accounts are eligible for the managed audit program in a manner that is consistent with the efficient use of its auditing resources and the maximum effectiveness of the program.

(b) A taxpayer is not required to participate in the managed audit program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 6.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

9259.1.

A taxpayer’s account is eligible for the managed audit program only if the taxpayer meets all of the following criteria:

(a) The taxpayer’s business involves few or no statutory exemptions.

(b) The taxpayer’s business involves a single or a small number of clearly defined taxability issues.

(c) The taxpayer is taxed pursuant to this part and agrees to participate in the managed audit program.

(d) The taxpayer has the resources to comply with the managed audit instructions provided by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 7.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

9259.2.

(a) If the board selects a taxpayer’s account for a managed audit, all of the following apply:

(1) The board shall identify all of the following:

(A) The audit period covered by the managed audit.

(B) The types of transactions covered by the managed audit.

(C) The specific procedures that the taxpayer is to follow in determining any liability.

(D) The records to be reviewed by the taxpayer.

(E) The manner in which the types of transactions are to be scheduled for review.

(F) The time period for completion of the managed audit.

(G) The time period for the payment of the liability and interest.

(H) Any other criteria that the board may require for completion of the managed audit.

(2) The taxpayer shall:

(A) Examine its books, papers, records, and
 equipment to determine if it has any unreported tax liability for the audit period.

(B) Make available to the board for verification all computations and books, papers, records, and equipment examined pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(b) The information provided by the taxpayer pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) is the same information that is required for the completion of any other audit that the board may conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 8.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

9259.3.

Nothing in this article limits the board’s authority to examine the books, papers, records, and equipment of a taxpayer under Section 9254.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 9.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

9259.4.

Upon completion of the managed audit and verification by the board, interest on any unpaid liability shall be computed at one-half the rate that would otherwise be imposed for liabilities covered by the audit period. Payment of the liabilities and interest shall be made within the time period specified by the board. If the requirements for the managed audit are not satisfied, the board may proceed to examine the records of the taxpayer in a manner to be determined by the board under
 law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 10.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. The California Taxpayers’ Bill of Rights [9260. - 9278.]

9260.

The board shall administer this article. Unless the context indicates otherwise, the provisions of this article shall apply to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9261.

(a) The board shall establish the position of the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate. The advocate or his or her designee shall be responsible for facilitating resolution of taxpayer complaints and problems, including any taxpayer complaints regarding unsatisfactory treatment of taxpayers by board employees, and staying actions where taxpayers have suffered or will suffer irreparable loss as the result of those actions. Applicable statutes of limitation shall be tolled during the pendency of a stay. Any penalties and interest that would otherwise
 accrue shall not be affected by the granting of a stay.

(b) The advocate shall report directly to the executive officer of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9262.

(a) The board shall develop and implement an education and information program directed at, but not limited to, all of the following groups:

(1) Taxpayers newly registered with the board.

(2) Board audit and compliance staff.

(b) The education and information program shall include all of the following:

(1) A program of written communication with newly registered taxpayers explaining in simplified terms their duties and responsibilities.

(2) Participation in seminars and similar programs organized by federal, state, and local agencies.

(3) Revision of taxpayer educational materials currently produced by the board that explain the most common areas of taxpayer nonconformance in simplified terms.

(4) Implementation of a continuing education program for audit and compliance personnel to include the application of new legislation to taxpayer activities and areas of recurrent taxpayer noncompliance or inconsistency of administration.

(c) Electronic media used pursuant to this section shall not
 represent the voice, picture, or name of members of the board or of the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 929, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

9263.

The board shall conduct an annual hearing before the full board where industry representatives and individual taxpayers are allowed to present their proposals on changes to the Use Fuel Tax Law which may further improve voluntary compliance and the relationship between taxpayers and government.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9264.

The board shall prepare and publish brief but comprehensive statements in simple and nontechnical language that explain procedures, remedies, and the rights and obligations of the board and taxpayers. As appropriate, statements shall be provided to taxpayers with the initial notice of audit, the notice of proposed additional taxes, any subsequent notice of tax due, or other substantive notices. Additionally, the board shall include this language for statements in the annual tax information bulletins that are mailed to taxpayers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9265.

(a) The total amount of revenue collected or assessed pursuant to this part shall not be used for any of the following:

(1) To evaluate individual officers or employees.

(2) To impose or suggest production quotas or goals, other than quotas or goals with respect to accounts receivable.

(b) The board shall certify in its annual report submitted
 pursuant to Section 15616 of the Government Code that revenue collected or assessed is not used in a manner prohibited by subdivision (a).

(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the setting of goals and the evaluation of performance with respect to productivity and the efficient use of time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9266.

The board shall develop and implement a program that will evaluate an individual employee’s or officer’s performance with respect to his or her contact with taxpayers. The development and implementation of the program shall be coordinated with the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9267.

The board shall, in cooperation with the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate, and other interested taxpayer-oriented groups, develop a plan to reduce the time required to resolve petitions for redetermination and claims for refunds. The plan shall include determination of standard timeframes and special review of cases which take more time than the appropriate standard timeframe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9268.

Procedures of the board, relating to appeals staff review conferences before a staff attorney or supervising tax auditor independent of the assessing department, shall include all of the following:

(a) Any conference shall be held at a reasonable time at a board office that is convenient to the taxpayer.

(b) The conference may be recorded only if prior notice is given to the taxpayer and the taxpayer is entitled to receive a copy of
 the recording.

(c) The taxpayer shall be informed prior to any conference that he or she has a right to have present at the conference his or her attorney, accountant, or other designated agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9269.

(a) Every taxpayer is entitled to be reimbursed for any reasonable fees and expenses related to a hearing before the board if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The taxpayer files a claim for the fee and expenses with the board within one year of the date the decision of the board becomes final.

(2) The board, in its sole discretion, finds that the action taken by the board staff was
 unreasonable.

(3) The board decides that the taxpayer be awarded a specific amount of fees and expenses related to the hearing, in an amount determined by the board in its sole discretion.

(b) To determine whether the board staff has been unreasonable, the board shall consider whether the board staff has established that its position was substantially justified.

(c) The amount of reimbursed fees and expenses shall be limited to the following:

(1) Fees and expenses incurred after the date of the notice of determination, jeopardy determination, or a claim for refund.

(2) If the board finds that the staff was unreasonable with respect to certain issues but reasonable with respect to other
 issues, the amount of reimbursed fees and expenses shall be limited to those that relate to the issues where the staff was unreasonable.

(d) Any proposed award by the board pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days prior to the effective date of the award.

(e) The amendments to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall be operative for claims filed on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9270.

(a) An officer or employee of the board acting in connection with any law administered by the board shall not knowingly authorize, require, or conduct any investigation of, or surveillance over, any person for nontax administration related purposes.

(b) Any person violating subdivision (a) shall be subject to disciplinary action in accordance with the State Civil Service Act, including dismissal from office or discharge from employment.

(c) This section shall not apply with respect to any otherwise lawful investigation concerning organized crime activities.

(d) This section is not intended to prohibit, restrict, or prevent the exchange of information if the person is being investigated for multiple violations that include use fuel tax violations.

(e) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Investigation” means any oral or written inquiry directed to any person, organization, or governmental agency.

(2) “Surveillance” means the monitoring of persons, places, or events by means of electronic interception, overt or covert observations, or photography, and the use of informants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 618.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

9271.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department, its staff, and the Attorney General pursue settlements as authorized under this section with respect to civil tax matters in dispute that are the subject of protests, appeals, or refund claims, consistent with a reasonable evaluation of the costs and risks associated with litigation of these matters.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), no recommendation of settlement shall be submitted to the director for approval unless and until that recommendation has been submitted by the chief counsel to the Attorney General. Within 30 days of receiving that recommendation,
 the Attorney General shall review the recommendation and advise the chief counsel, in writing, of their conclusions as to whether the recommendation is reasonable from an overall perspective. The chief counsel shall, with each recommendation of settlement submitted to the director, also submit the Attorney General’s written conclusions obtained pursuant to this paragraph.

(2) (A) A settlement of any civil tax matter in dispute involving a reduction of tax or penalties in settlement, the total of which reduction of tax and penalties in settlement does not exceed
 eleven thousand five hundred dollars ($11,500), may be approved by the director.

(B) Beginning on July 1, 2029, and each fifth fiscal year thereafter, the department shall adjust the amount specified in subparagraph (A) by increasing that amount by a percentage amount equal to the increase in the California Consumer Price Index, as calculated by the Department of Finance, with the resulting amount rounded to the nearest one hundred dollars ($100). The first adjustment pursuant to this subparagraph shall be a percentage amount equal to the increase in the California Consumer Price Index from January 1, 2024, to January 1, 2029. Subsequent fifth fiscal year adjustments shall cover subsequent five-year periods. The incremental change shall be added to the previously adjusted amount.

(c) Whenever a reduction of tax, or penalties, or total tax and penalties in settlement in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved pursuant to this section, there shall be placed on file, for at least one year, in the office of the director a public record with respect to that settlement. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name or names of the taxpayers who are parties to the settlement.

(2) The total amount in dispute.

(3) The amount agreed to pursuant to the settlement.

(4) A summary of the reasons why the settlement is in the best interests of the
 State of California.

(5) (A) For any settlement approved by the director, except those settlements approved pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the Attorney General’s conclusion as to whether the recommendation of settlement was reasonable from an overall perspective.

(B) The public record shall not include any information that relates to any trade secret, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or organizational structure that, if disclosed, would adversely affect the taxpayer or the national defense.

(d) The director shall not participate in the settlement of tax matters pursuant to this section, except as provided in subdivision (e).

(e) (1) Any recommendation for settlement shall be approved or disapproved by the director within 45 days of the submission of that recommendation to the director. Any recommendation for settlement that is not either approved or disapproved by the director within 45 days of the submission of that recommendation shall be deemed approved.

(2) Where the director disapproves a recommendation for settlement, at the discretion of the director and chief counsel, the matter shall be remanded to staff for further negotiation, and may be resubmitted to the director, in the same manner and subject to the same requirements as the initial
 submission.

(f) All settlements entered into pursuant to this section shall be final and nonappealable, except upon a showing of fraud or misrepresentation with respect to a material fact.

(g) Except as provided in subdivision (c), any settlement considered or entered into pursuant to this section shall constitute confidential tax information for purposes of Section 9255.

(h) The Legislature finds that it is essential for fiscal purposes that the settlement program authorized by this section be expeditiously implemented. Accordingly, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any determination, rule, notice, or
 guideline established or issued by the department in implementing and administering the settlement program authorized by this section.

(i) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to any settlements approved on or after January 1, 2024.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 511, Sec. 5.   (SB 889)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9272.

(a) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall release any levy or notice to withhold issued pursuant to this part on any property in the event that the expense of the sale process exceeds the liability for which the levy is made.

(b) (1) (A) The Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate may order the
 release of any levy or notice to withhold issued pursuant to this part or, within 90 days from the receipt of funds pursuant to a levy or notice to withhold, order the return of any amount up to two thousand three hundred dollars ($2,300) of moneys received, upon his or her finding that the levy or notice to withhold threatens the health or welfare of the taxpayer or his or her spouse and dependents or family.

(B) The amount the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate may return to each taxpayer subject to a levy or notice to withhold, is limited to two thousand three hundred dollars ($2,300), or the adjusted amount as specified in paragraph (2), in any monthly period.

(C) The Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate may order amounts returned in the case of a seizure of property as a result of a jeopardy determination, subject to the amounts set or adjusted pursuant to this section and if the ultimate
 collection of the amount due is no longer in jeopardy.

(2) (A) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall adjust the two-thousand-three-hundred-dollar ($2,300) amount specified in paragraph (1) as follows:

(i) On or before March 1, 2016, and on or before March 1 each year thereafter, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall multiply the amount applicable for the current fiscal year by the inflation factor adjustment calculated based on the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index, as recorded by the California Department of Industrial Relations for the most recent year available, and the formula set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 17041. The resulting amount will be the applicable amount for the succeeding fiscal year only when the applicable amount computed is equal to or exceeds a new
 operative threshold, as defined in subparagraph (B).

(ii) When the applicable amount equals or exceeds an operative threshold specified in subparagraph (B), the resulting applicable amount, rounded to the nearest multiple of one hundred dollars ($100), shall be operative for purposes of paragraph (1) beginning July 1 of the succeeding fiscal year.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “operative threshold” means an amount that exceeds by at least one hundred dollars ($100) the greater of either the amount specified in paragraph (1) or the amount computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) as the operative adjustment to the amount specified in paragraph (1).

(c) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall not sell any seized property until it has first notified the taxpayer in writing of the exemptions from
 levy under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) Except as provided in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), this section shall not apply to the seizure of any property as a result of a jeopardy determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 181, Sec. 2.   (SB 1507)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

9272.1.

(a) Except in any case where the board finds collection of the tax to be in jeopardy, if any property has been levied upon, the property or the proceeds from the sale of the property shall be returned to the taxpayer if the board determines any one of the following:

(1) The levy on the property was not in accordance with the law.

(2) The taxpayer has entered into and is in compliance with an installment
 payment agreement pursuant to Section 9033 to satisfy the tax liability for which the levy was imposed, unless that or another agreement allows for the levy.

(3) The return of the property will facilitate the collection of the tax liability or will be in the best interest of the state and the taxpayer.

(b) Property returned under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) is subject to the provisions of Section 9274.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 929, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

9273.

Exemptions from levy under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be adjusted for purposes of enforcing the collection of debts under this part to reflect changes in the California Consumer Price Index whenever the change is more than 5 percent higher than any previous adjustment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 144.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

9274.

(a) A taxpayer may file a claim with the board for reimbursement of bank charges and any other reasonable third-party check charge fees incurred by the taxpayer as the direct result of an erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action by the board. Bank and third-party charges include a financial institution’s or third party’s customary charge for
 complying with the levy or notice to withhold instructions and reasonable charges for overdrafts that are a direct consequence of the erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action. The charges are those paid by the taxpayer and not waived or reimbursed by the financial institution or third party. Each claimant applying for reimbursement shall file a claim with the board that shall be in a form as may be prescribed by the board. In order for the board to grant a claim, the board shall determine that both of the following conditions have been satisfied:

(1) The erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action was caused by board error.

(2) Prior to the erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action, the taxpayer responded to all
 contacts by the board and provided the board with any requested information or documentation sufficient to establish the taxpayer’s position. This provision may be waived by the board for reasonable cause.

(b) Claims pursuant to this section shall be filed within 90 days from the date the bank and third-party charges were incurred by the taxpayer. Within 30 days from the date the claim is received, the board shall respond to the claim. If the board denies the claim, the taxpayer shall be notified in writing of the reason or reasons for the denial of the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 253, Sec. 2.   (SB 442)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

9275.

(a) At least 30 days prior to the filing or recording of liens under Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) or Chapter 14.5 (commencing with Section 7220) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the department shall mail to the taxpayer a preliminary notice. The notice shall specify the statutory authority of the department for filing or recording the lien, indicate the earliest date on which the lien may be filed or recorded, and state the remedies available to the taxpayer to prevent the filing or recording of the lien. In the event tax liens are filed for the same liability in multiple counties, only one preliminary notice shall be sent.

(b) The preliminary notice required by this section shall not apply to
 jeopardy determinations issued under Article 4 (commencing with Section 8826) of Chapter 4.

(c) If the department determines that filing a lien was in error, it shall mail a release to the taxpayer and the entity recording the lien as soon as possible, but no later than seven days, after this determination and receipt of lien recording information. The release shall contain a statement that the lien was filed in error. In the event the erroneous lien is obstructing a lawful transaction, the department shall immediately issue a release of lien to the taxpayer and the entity recording the lien.

(d) When the department releases a lien erroneously filed, notice of that fact shall be mailed to the taxpayer and, upon the request of the taxpayer, a copy of the release shall be mailed to the major credit reporting companies in the county where the lien was filed.

(e) (1) The department may release or subordinate a lien if the department determines any of the following:

(A) Release or subordination will facilitate the collection of the tax liability.

(B) Release or subordination will be in the best interest of the state and the taxpayer.

(C) Release or subordination will be in the best interest of the state and another person that is not the taxpayer but that holds an interest with the taxpayer in the property that is subject to the lien. 

(2) The amendments added to this subdivision do not constitute a change in, and are declaratory of, existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 24.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9276.

For the purposes of this part only, the board shall not revoke or suspend a person’s permit pursuant to Section 8704 or 8714 unless the board has mailed a notice preliminary to revocation or suspension that indicates that the taxpayer will be suspended by a date certain pursuant to that section. The notice preliminary to suspension shall be mailed to the taxpayer at least 60 days before the date certain.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 145.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

9277.

(a) If any officer or employee of the board recklessly disregards board-published procedures, a taxpayer aggrieved by that action or omission may bring an action for damages against the State of California in superior court.

(b) In any action brought under subdivision (a), upon finding of liability on the part of the State of California, the state shall be liable to the plaintiff in an amount equal to the sum of all of the following:

(1) Actual and direct monetary damages sustained by the plaintiff as a result of the actions or omissions.

(2) Reasonable litigation costs including any of the following:

(A) Reasonable court costs.

(B) Prevailing market rates for the kind or quality of services furnished in connection with any of the following:

(i) The reasonable expenses of expert witnesses in connection with the civil proceeding, except that no expert witness shall be compensated at a rate in excess of the highest rate of compensation for expert witnesses paid by the State of California.

(ii) The reasonable cost of any study, analysis, engineering report, test,
 or project that is found by the court to be necessary for the preparation of the party’s case.

(iii) Reasonable fees paid or incurred for the services of attorneys in connection with the civil proceeding, except that those fees shall not be in excess of seventy-five dollars ($75) per hour unless the court determines that an increase in the cost of living or a special factor, such as the limited availability of qualified attorneys for the proceeding, justifies a higher rate.

(c) In the awarding of damages under subdivision (b), the court shall take into consideration the negligence or omissions, if any, on the part of the plaintiff which contributed to the damages.

(d) Whenever it appears to the court that the taxpayer’s position in the proceeding brought under subdivision (a) is frivolous, the court may impose a
 penalty against the plaintiff in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000). A penalty so imposed shall be paid upon notice and demand from the board and shall be collected as a tax imposed under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9278.

(a) Beginning January 1, 2003, the director of the department, or their delegates, may compromise any final tax liability.

(b) For purposes of this section, “a final tax liability” means any final tax liability arising under Part 3 (commencing with Section 8601), or related interest, additions to tax, penalties, or other amounts assessed under this part.

(c) (1) Offers in compromise shall be considered only for liabilities that were generated from a business that has been discontinued or transferred, where the taxpayer making the offer no longer has a controlling interest or association with the transferred business or has a controlling interest or association with a similar type
 of business as the transferred or discontinued business.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a qualified final tax liability may be compromised regardless of whether the business has been discontinued or transferred or whether the taxpayer has a controlling interest or association with a similar type of business as the transferred or discontinued business. All other provisions of this section that apply to a final tax liability shall also apply to a qualified final tax liability, and a compromise shall not be made under this subdivision unless all other requirements of this section are met. For purposes of this subdivision, a “qualified final tax liability” means either of the following:

(A) That part of a final tax liability, including related interest, additions to tax, penalties or other amounts assessed under this part, arising from a transaction or transactions in which the
 department finds no evidence that the vendor collected use fuel tax reimbursement from the purchaser or other person and which was determined against the vendor under Article 2 (commencing with Section 8776), Article 3 (commencing with Section 8801), or Article 5 (commencing with Section 8851) of Chapter 4.

(B) A final tax liability, including related interest, additions to tax, penalties or other amounts assessed under this part, arising under Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 9021) of Chapter 5.

(3) A qualified final tax liability may not be compromised with any of the following:

(A) A taxpayer who previously received a compromise under paragraph (2) for a liability, or a part thereof, arising from a transaction or transactions that are substantially similar to the transaction or transactions attributable to the
 liability for which the taxpayer is making the offer.

(B) A business that was transferred by a taxpayer who previously received a compromise under paragraph (2) and who has a controlling interest or association with the transferred business, when the liability for which the offer is made is attributable to a transaction or transactions substantially similar to the transaction or transactions for which the taxpayer’s liability was previously compromised.

(C) A business in which a taxpayer who previously received a compromise under paragraph (2) has a controlling interest or association with a similar type of business for which the taxpayer received the compromise, when the liability of the business making the offer arose from a transaction or transactions substantially similar to the transaction or transactions for which the taxpayer’s liability was previously compromised.

(d) The department may, in its discretion, enter into a written agreement that permits the taxpayer to pay the compromise in installments for a period not exceeding one year. The agreement may provide that the installments shall be paid by electronic funds transfers or any other means to facilitate the payment of each installment.
